Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1946.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.474] TREATMENT AND MANAGEMENT OF PAIN. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Requirement. new text end new text begin (a) A health plan must provide coverage for alternatives to the prescription of opioids to treat and manage pain, including nonopioid prescription drugs. new text end new text begin (b) A health plan must provide coverage for a minimum of two alternative prescription drugs approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration to treat and manage pain that are not Schedule I, II, or III controlled substances, if approved alternative prescription drugs are available. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) A health plan is prohibited from providing preferential coverage for and access to opioids. new text end new text begin (b) A health plan is prohibited from establishing utilization controls, including but not limited to prior authorization or step therapy requirements, for clinically appropriate nonopioid prescription drugs approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration to treat and manage pain that are more restrictive or extensive than the least restrictive or extensive utilization controls applicable to any clinically appropriate opioid drug. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Educational materials. new text end new text begin A health plan company must annually distribute educational materials to in-network health care providers and enrollees regarding access to the pain treatment and management options described in subdivision 1 and must make the educational materials and information publicly available on the health plan company's website. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, and applies to health plans offered, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end